Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-260
Standardized juvenile detention screening instrument.

The Office of Probation Administration shall prepare and distribute to probation officers a standardized juvenile detention screening instrument. The types of risk factors to be included as well as the format of this standardized juvenile detention screening instrument shall be determined by the office. The standardized juvenile detention screening instrument shall be used as an assessment tool statewide by probation officers under section 43-260.01 in order to determine if detention of the juvenile is necessary and, if so, whether detention or an alternative to detention is indicated. Probation officers trained to administer the juvenile detention screening instrument shall act as juvenile intake probation officers. Only duly trained probation officers shall be authorized to administer the juvenile detention screening instrument.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 13;

Laws 2001, LB 451, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 940, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB894, § 10.